Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.050

Administrative committee—Powers and duties.

The administrative committee shall, subject to RCW 44.04.260:

(1) Adopt policies, procedures, and standards regarding the information processing and communications systems of the legislature;

(2) Establish appropriate charges for services, equipment, and publications provided by the legislative information processing and communications systems, applicable to legislative and nonlegislative users as determined by the administrative committee;

(3) Adopt a compensation plan for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

(4) Approve strategic and tactical information technology plans and provide guidance in operational matters required to carry out (a) the purposes of this chapter; and (b) the distribution of legislative information.

[ 2020 c 114 s 11; 2007 c 18 s 4; 2001 c 259 s 18; 1986 c 61 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.